Mississippi, session 2026, HB1705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Legislature finds that: (a)  Mississippi's Third Grade Reading Gate, Section 37-177-1, et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, establishes promotion standards and requires good-faith remediation for students at risk of retention due to reading underachievement; (b)  A significant number of students subject to retention under the Third Grade Reading Gate possess average to above-average intelligence but experience persistent reading failure consistent with dyslexia; (c)  Grade retention without intensive, evidence-based structured literacy remediation fails to address the underlying neurological causes of dyslexia and increases long-term academic and economic risk; (d)  Orton-Gillingham-based structured literacy is the nationally recognized, evidence-based methodology for remediating dyslexia; and (e)  The Legislature has authority to authorize alternative, evidence-based intervention models that satisfy statutory remediation requirements while improving literacy outcomes and reducing unnecessary retention. (2)  The purpose of this act is to: (a)  Establish a structured literacy pilot program that satisfies the remediation intent of the Third Grade Reading Gate; (b)  Provide a lawful alternative to grade retention through intensive dyslexia-specific remediation; (c)  Improve identification and remediation of dyslexia; (d)  Develop an Orton-Gillingham Structured Literacy program, including a teacher training component; (e)  Create replicable public and private models for dyslexia remediation; and (f)  Increase statewide access to evidence-based structured literacy instruction. SECTION 2.  As used in this act, the following terms have the meanings as defined in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Low student reading performance" means reading performance below the thirtieth (30th) percentile on nationally norm-referenced, grade-level measures of reading accuracy and fluency. (b)  "Structured literacy" means explicit, systematic, cumulative, diagnostic, and prescriptive instruction consistent with Orton-Gillingham principles. (c) "Dyslexia" means a neurologically based, language-related learning disability identified through a clinical model of evaluation. (d)  "Clinical identification of dyslexia" means identification by a multidisciplinary team of subject matter experts, which shall include at least one Certified Academic Language Therapist (CALT). (e)  "Approved reading intervention" means an intervention authorized by statute that satisfies remediation requirements under Section 37-177-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972. (f)  "Pilot Program" means the Structured Literacy Pilot Program authorized by this act and administered by the Mississippi Dyslexia Institute. SECTION 3. (1)  The Mississippi Dyslexia Institute is authorized to establish and administer a Structured Literacy Pilot Program for a period of three (3) years, with eligibility for one (1) additional three-year extension upon legislative approval. (2)  The total number of students served statewide under the Pilot Program shall not exceed eighty (80) students during the pilot period. (3)  Students may be identified and placed into the Pilot Program: (a)  Upon demonstration of low student reading performance; (b)  Upon clinical identification of dyslexia by a multidisciplinary team including a CALT; and (c)  In lieu of grade retention for reading underachievement, including students subject to the Third Grade Reading Gate. (4)  Participation in the Pilot Program shall constitute a good-faith, approved reading intervention for purposes of compliance with Section 37-177-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 4.  To promote innovation and access, the Mississippi Dyslexia Institute may implement the Pilot Program with reduced regulatory barriers related to instructional delivery, educator recruitment, instructional materials, technology, and facilities, provided that no health, safety, attendance, or child welfare protections are waived. SECTION 5. The Pilot Program shall: (a)  Improve reading fluency and accuracy outcomes for students identified with dyslexia through evidence-based literacy intervention, as demonstrated by measurable gains on standardized reading assessments; (b)  Achieve sustained reading improvement over the course of three (3) to four (4) years of participation; (c)  Reduce grade retention by substituting intensive remediation for grade retention; and (d)  Align reading proficiency more closely with students' intellectual potential. SECTION 6. (1)  Over the pilot period, the Mississippi Dyslexia Institute shall develop a Mississippi-created Orton-Gillingham Structured Literacy program. (2)  The program shall: (a)  Include a teacher training component designed to prepare educators in Orton-Gillingham-based structured literacy; and (b)  Be designed for statewide replication upon legislative authorization. SECTION 7. The Mississippi Dyslexia Institute may partner with one or more low-performing public school districts with high retention rates in kindergarten through fourth grade to provide structured literacy remediation as the sole focus of the partnership for a period of three (3) years. SECTION 8. (1)  Instruction and remediation shall be prioritized over excessive testing. (2)  Students shall receive ongoing progress monitoring using nationally norm-referenced measures. (3)  Orton-Gillingham-based structured literacy methodologies shall be the primary instructional approach. SECTION 9. (1)  The Pilot Program shall track reading progress using valid, reliable, and nationally norm-referenced assessments. (2)  An annual report shall be submitted to the Mississippi Legislature detailing: (a)  Student reading outcomes; (b)  Promotion and retention data; (c)  Fiscal impacts and retention avoidance; (d)  Progress toward development of the structured literacy program and teacher training model; and (e)  Recommendations for continuation, expansion, or termination. SECTION 10. (1)  The Pilot Program shall receive funding equivalent to the average per-pupil expenditure that would otherwise be used to retain the same student. (2)  Avoided retention shall result in savings of at least one (1) additional year of K-12 education for the State. SECTION 11. If any provision of this act is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions of this act. SECTION 12.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.